Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2705
Employee protections.

Any person who has authority to recommend, approve, direct, or otherwise take or affect personnel action shall not, with respect to such authority:

(1) Take personnel action against an employee because of the disclosure of information by the employee to the Public Counsel or an official which the employee reasonably believes evidences wrongdoing;

(2) Take personnel action against an employee as a reprisal for the submission of an allegation of wrongdoing or a violation of this section to the Public Counsel or official by such employee; or

(3) Take personnel action against an employee as a reprisal for providing information or testimony, pursuant to an investigation or hearing held under the State Government Effectiveness Act, to the Public Counsel, an official, the State Personnel Board, a corresponding personnel appeals board, or the director or chief operating officer of an agency.

Laws 1993, LB 44, § 5.